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−DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI−303

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC C 1340 / 47 Center Differential Lock Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1240 /47 Openorshort circuit incenterdifferential lockcircuit.
SCenterdifferential locksystem
SCenterdifferential lockcircuit

WIRING DIAGRAM

DIARQ−01
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkthecenterdifferential is freeandcenterdiff. lockswitch isOFF.

NG Repair the center differential lock system.

OK
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2 Is DTC output?

Check DTC on page DI−185.

NO END

YES

3 Check that bulb for center diff. lock indicator light is not burnt out.

NG Replace indicator light.

OK

4 Check for open circuit in harness and connector between battery and center diff.
lock indicator light, center diff. lock indicator light and skid control ECU (See
page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

5 Check voltage between terminal EXI of skid control ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove skid control ECU with connectors still connected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminal EXI of skid control

ECU and body ground when transfer in L4 position.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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6Checkcenterdiff. lock indicatorswitch(Full −time4WDtype:SeePub.No.
RM616EonpageTR −53).

NG Replace center diff. lock indicator switch.

OK

Check and replace skid control ECU.


